Idaho, session 2026, H0976.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 5 of House Bill No. 968, if enacted by the Sec-
ond Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same
is hereby amended to read as follows:
Section 5. CASH TRANSFER TO THE STRATEGIC INITIATIVES
PROGRAM FUND AND LOCAL HIGHWAY DISTRIBUTION FUND FOR FISCAL YEAR
2026. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer 50% of the interest earnings generated
in fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026 to the American Rescue Plan
Act State and Local Fiscal Recovery Fund or $32,877,300, whichever
is greater, to be distributed as 60% to the Strategic Initiatives
Program (Dedicated) Fund and 40% to the Local Highway Distribution
Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026. The amount shall be confirmed with the Legislative
Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.